Utah statutes.
67-19a-406.   Procedural steps to be followed by aggrieved employee --
Hearing before hearing officer -- Evidentiary and procedural rules.
(1) (a)  The administrator shall employ a certified court reporter to record
the hearing and prepare an official transcript of the hearing.
(b)  The official transcript of the proceedings and all exhibits, briefs,
motions, and pleadings received by the hearing officer are the official record
of the proceeding.
(2) (a)  The agency has the burden of proof in all grievances.
(b)  The agency must prove the agency's case by substantial evidence.
(3) (a)  The hearing officer shall issue a written decision within 20 working
days after the hearing is adjourned.
(b)  If the hearing officer does not issue a decision within 20 working days,
the agency that is a party to the grievance is not liable for any claimed back
wages or benefits after the date the decision is due.
(4)  The hearing officer may:
(a)  not award attorney fees or costs to either party;
(b)  close a hearing by complying with the procedures and requirements of
Title 52, Chapter 4, Open and Public Meetings Act;
(c)  seal the file and the evidence produced at the hearing if the evidence
raises questions about an employee's character, professional competence, or
physical or mental health;
(d)  grant continuances according to rule; and
(e)  decide a motion, an issue regarding discovery, or another issue in
accordance with this chapter.
